Utah statutes.
58-54-301.   License required.

(1)  An individual may not engage in the practice of radiologic technology or the practice of a radiologist assistant unless licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter.

(2)  The division shall issue to persons qualified under this chapter a license in the classification of radiologic technologist, radiologist assistant, or radiology practical technician.

(3) (a)  A license shall be issued without regard to any area of practice specialty as a radiologic technologist.

(b)  A license for a radiology practical technician may be issued certifying the practical technician for a specialty type or limited practice.

